Florida, session 2026, HB335.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
17
18 Section 1. Subsections (15) through (17) and (18) through
19 (21) of section 331.303, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as
20 subsections (16) through (18) and (20) through (23),
21 respectively, and new subsections (15) and (19) are added to
22 that section to read:
23 331.303 Definitions.—
24 (15) "Quintimodal transportation hub" means a spaceport
25 territory within which interconnected transportation facilities
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb335-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 335 2026
26 are available to move people or property by means of road,
27 railroad, airport, seaport, and spaceport facilities.
28 (19) "Spaceport director or commander" means the
29 individual designated by the governing body, agency, or military
30 authority of a spaceport territory to administer the operations,
31 maintenance, safety, and local agreements of that facility.
32 Section 2. Subsections (16) and (17) of section 331.3051,
33 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (17) and (18),
34 respectively, and a new subsection (16) is added to that section
35 to read:
36 331.3051 Duties of Space Florida.—Space Florida shall:
37 (16) In coordination with the Department of
38 Transportation, metropolitan planning organizations, and local
39 governments, enhance and promote the development and use of
40 quintimodal transportation hubs in this state.
41 Section 3. Section 331.3052, Florida Statutes, is created
42 to read:
43 331.3052 Powers and duties of spaceport operators.—
44 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part,
45 authority over the operational oversight, management, and day-
46 to-day administration of each spaceport shall be vested in the
47 spaceport director or commander for that facility.
48 (2) Space Florida shall be responsible for statewide
49 strategic planning, financing, economic development, and
50 intergovernmental coordination, but may not exercise direct
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb335-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 335 2026
51 control over local operational decisions unless:
52 (a) Specifically requested in writing by the spaceport
53 director or commander; or
54 (b) Required to comply with applicable federal law or
55 regulation.
56 (3) Each spaceport shall develop and maintain an
57 operational governance plan consistent with Space Florida's
58 statewide strategic plan. Such plan must be submitted annually
59 to Space Florida, but is not subject to approval by Space
60 Florida.
61 (4) This section does not diminish Space Florida's
62 authority to finance, lease, or own spaceport facilities or to
63 coordinate economic development initiatives across multiple
64 spaceport territories.
65 Section 4. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
66 331.3081, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (f) is
67 added to that subsection, to read:
68 331.3081 Board of directors.—
69 (1) Space Florida shall be governed by an independent
70 board of directors that consists of the Governor, who shall
71 serve ex officio, or who may appoint a designee to serve, as the
72 chair and a voting member of the board, and the following
73 appointed members:
74 (e) A representative of each of the following entities,
75 who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the board,
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb335-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 335 2026
76 appointed by the Governor:
77 1. The Jacksonville Aviation Authority.
78 2. The Titusville-Cocoa Airport Authority.
79 (f) One member who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting
80 member of the board, appointed by the Governor, who is 3. an
81 employee or official of a port district or port authority as
82 defined in s. 315.02(2).
83 Section 5. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
84 330.41, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
85 330.41 Unmanned Aircraft Systems Act.—
86 (2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this act, the term:
87 (b) "Critical infrastructure facility" means any of the
88 following, if completely enclosed by a fence or other physical
89 barrier that is obviously designed to exclude intruders, or if
90 clearly marked with a sign or signs which indicate that entry is
91 forbidden and which are posted on the property in a manner
92 reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders:
93 1. A power generation or transmission facility,
94 substation, switching station, or electrical control center.
95 2. A chemical or rubber manufacturing or storage facility.
96 3. A water intake structure, water treatment facility,
97 wastewater treatment plant, or pump station.
98 4. A mining facility.
99 5. A natural gas or compressed gas compressor station,
100 storage facility, or natural gas or compressed gas pipeline.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb335-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 335 2026
101 6. A liquid natural gas or propane gas terminal or storage
102 facility.
103 7. Any portion of an aboveground oil or gas pipeline.
104 8. A refinery.
105 9. A gas processing plant, including a plant used in the
106 processing, treatment, or fractionation of natural gas.
107 10. A wireless or wired communications facility, including
108 the tower, antennas, support structures, and all associated
109 ground-based equipment.
110 11. A seaport as listed in s. 311.09(1), which need not be
111 completely enclosed by a fence or other physical barrier and
112 need not be marked with a sign or signs indicating that entry is
113 forbidden.
114 12. An inland port or other facility or group of
115 facilities serving as a point of intermodal transfer of freight
116 in a specific area physically separated from a seaport.
117 13. An airport as defined in s. 330.27.
118 14. A spaceport territory as defined in s. 331.303 s.
119 331.303(19).
120 15. A military installation as defined in 10 U.S.C. s.
121 2801(c)(4) and an armory as defined in s. 250.01.
122 16. A dam as defined in s. 373.403(1) or other structures,
123 such as locks, floodgates, or dikes, which are designed to
124 maintain or control the level of navigable waterways.
125 17. A state correctional institution as defined in s.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb335-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 335 2026
126 944.02 or a contractor-operated correctional facility authorized
127 under chapter 957.
128 18. A secure detention center or facility as defined in s.
129 985.03, or a moderate-risk residential facility, a high-risk
130 residential facility, or a maximum-risk residential facility as
131 those terms are described in s. 985.03(44).
132 19. A county detention facility as defined in s. 951.23.
133 20. A critical infrastructure facility as defined in s.
134 692.201.
135 Section 6. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of section
136 331.310, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
137 331.310 Powers and duties of the board of directors.—
138 (2) The board of directors shall:
139 (e) Prepare an annual report of operations as a supplement
140 to the annual report required under s. 331.3051(18) s.
141 331.3051(17). The report must include, but not be limited to, a
142 balance sheet, an income statement, a statement of changes in
143 financial position, a reconciliation of changes in equity
144 accounts, a summary of significant accounting principles, the
145 auditor's report, a summary of the status of existing and
146 proposed bonding projects, comments from management about the
147 year's business, and prospects for the next year.
148 Section 7. Paragraph (i) of subsection (2) of section
149 692.201, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
150 692.201 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb335-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 335 2026
151 (2) "Critical infrastructure facility" means any of the
152 following, if it employs measures such as fences, barriers, or
153 guard posts that are designed to exclude unauthorized persons:
154 (i) A spaceport territory as defined in s. 331.303 s.
155 331.303(19).
156 Section 8. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb335-00